Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202085-507
Nebraska National Guard; spouse and children of deceased member; tuition; credit; conditions.

The spouse and children of any member of the Nebraska National Guard who dies while serving in the active service of the state shall be entitled to a credit of one hundred percent of the tuition charges in any state-supported university, college, or community college or any independent, not-for-profit, regionally accredited college or university in this state, except that any spouse or child who attends an independent, not-for-profit, regionally accredited college or university in this state shall receive a credit in an amount no higher than that spouse or child would receive if attending the University of Nebraska-Lincoln. Such tuition credit shall be for any undergraduate course of education not exceeding four years, except that no credit shall be granted to the spouse after the tenth anniversary of the member's death and no credit shall be granted to a child after such child's twenty-fifth birthday. All persons eligible for tuition credit under this section shall obtain a certificate of eligibility from the Adjutant General of the Nebraska National Guard and present such certificate to the educational institution.

Laws 1978, LB 564, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 931, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1139, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB450, § 4.
January 1, 2021